Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2134YC (1) 91 cm/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 22.1, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 1. âGovernment bodyâ means this state, or any county, 3 city, township, school corporation, political subdivision, 4 tax-supported district, or instrumentality of a city or 5 township; a nonprofit corporation other than a fair conducting 6 a fair event as provided in chapter 174 , whose facilities or 7 indebtedness are supported in whole or in part with property 8 tax revenue and which is licensed to conduct pari-mutuel 9 wagering pursuant to chapter 99D ; the governing body of 10 a drainage or levee district as provided in chapter 468 , 11 including a board as defined in section 468.3 , regardless of 12 how the district is organized; or other entity of this state, 13 or any branch, department, board, bureau, commission, council, 14 committee, official, or officer of any of the foregoing or any 15 employee delegated the responsibility for implementing the 16 requirements of this chapter . 17